Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8007
Act; applicability.

The Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act does not regulate or otherwise limit the activity of any individual or entity that does not represent or advertise himself, herself, or itself as a certified industrial hygienist, CIH, or C.I.H. or as a provider of services to be performed by a certified industrial hygienist.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 7.